North Carolina, session 2025, SB502.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of three million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Cape Carteret for the construction of a new facility to serve as the town hall, police headquarters,
and emergency operations center.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S502-v-1*